Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Licensing Requirements.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 62, art. 1.

For license renewal and reinstatement; continuing education, see 12 AAC 62, art. 3.

Sec. 08.29.100.
Unlicensed use of title prohibited.

A person who is not licensed under this chapter may not

profess to be a licensed professional counselor, a professional counselor, or a licensed counselor; or

make use of a title, words, letters, or abbreviations that may reasonably be confused with the title of “licensed professional counselor,” “professional counselor,” or “licensed counselor.”

Violation of this section is a class B misdemeanor, except that a third or subsequent conviction for violating this section is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 75 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 17 SLA 2007)

Sec. 08.29.110.
Qualifications for licensure.

The board shall issue a professional counselor license to a person who applies for the license, submits the required fee, submits two letters of recommendation from professional counselors who are familiar with the applicant’s practice of professional counseling, and presents evidence satisfactory to the board that the person

is at least 18 years of age;

is not under investigation in this or another jurisdiction for an act that would constitute a violation of this chapter;

has not had a license related to the practice of counseling, psychology, marital and family therapy, or social work in this or another jurisdiction suspended, revoked, or surrendered in lieu of discipline unless the license has been fully reinstated in that jurisdiction;

has passed a written examination as required by the board; the board may provide that passing a nationally recognized examination for professional counselors is sufficient to meet the examination requirement of this paragraph;

has successfully completed either

an earned doctoral degree in counseling or a related professional field from a regionally or nationally accredited institution of higher education approved by the board; or

an earned master’s degree in counseling or a related professional field, from a regionally or nationally accredited institution of higher education approved by the board, and at least 60 graduate semester hours in counseling during or after earning the master’s degree; and

has, after earning the degree required under either (5)(A) or (B) of this subsection, had at least 3,000 hours of supervised experience in the practice of professional counseling performed over a period of at least two years under the supervision of a supervisor approved under AS

08.29.210

, with at least 1,000 hours of direct counseling with individuals, couples, families, or groups and at least 100 hours of face-to-face supervision by a supervisor approved under AS

08.29.210

unless, under regulations of the board, the board allows the supervision to be by telephonic or electronic means because of the remote location of the counselor.

The board may, in its regulations, specify the areas of study that must be covered in order to meet the educational requirements of (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 75 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 49 SLA 1999; am § 2 ch 12 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 62, art. 1.

For supervision, see 12 AAC 62, art. 2.

Sec. 08.29.120.
Licensure by credentials.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, the board may issue a license under this chapter to a person who is licensed in another jurisdiction to practice professional counseling if the board finds that the other jurisdiction has substantially the same or higher licensure requirements as this state.

The board may not license under this section a person who is under investigation in this or another jurisdiction for an act that would constitute a violation of this chapter until the investigation is complete and disciplinary sanctions, if any, are imposed and the person has complied with the sanctions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 75 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For temporary courtesy licenses, see AS

08.01.062

.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 62, art. 1.

Sec. 08.29.130.
Licensure of foreign-educated applicants.

The board may issue a license under this chapter to a person who

has completed a doctorate or master’s degree educational program in counseling or a related professional field in a foreign college or university approved by the board;

meets the requirements of AS

08.29.110

except for AS

08.29.110(a)(5)

; and

demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant’s experience, command of the English language, and completed academic program meet the standards of a relevant academic program of an accredited educational institution in the United States.

History.

(§ 1 ch 75 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 49 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 62, art. 1.

Sec. 08.29.140.
License renewal.

Renewal of a license under this chapter may not be granted unless the licensee, within the 24 months immediately preceding the renewal date, has completed the continuing education requirements established by the board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 75 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For license renewal and reinstatement; continuing education, see 12 AAC 62, art. 3.